Illinois, session 104th, SB3816.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Automated License Plate Recognition System Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "ALPR user" means a person or entity that owns or operates 8an ALPR device.9    "Automatic license plate reader" or "ALPR" means software, 10hardware or equipment, including mobile applications or fixed, 11mobile, or portable cameras, used to automatically record 12data, capture images, take photos and store vehicle license 13plate information. "Automatic license plate reader" or "ALPR" 14includes a device that is owned or operated by a person who is 15not an employee of a law enforcement agency or government 16entity to the extent that data collected by the reader is or 17may be shared with a law enforcement agency or government 18entity.19    "Automated license plate reader system" or "ALPR system" 20means a system, software, or computer algorithm, whether used 21independently or in combination with one or more fixed, 22mobile, or portable automated cameras or mobile applications, 23that is used to read and convert images of license plates and   SB3816- 2 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1the characters they contain into computer-readable data, that 2may result in a searchable computerized database. "Automated 3license plate reader system" or "ALPR system" includes an 4automated license plate recognition system. 5    "Biometric identifier" has the same meaning as in the 6Biometric Information Privacy Act.7    "Biometric information" means any information, regardless 8of how it is captured, converted, stored, or shared, based on 9an individual's biometric identifier used to identify an 10individual. "Biometric information" does not include 11information derived from items or procedures excluded under 12the definition of biometric identifiers.13    "Captured plate data" or "data" means the GPS coordinates, 14date and time, photograph and other digital images, license 15plate number, and any other information or data captured by, 16derived from, or inferred from any automated license plate 17reader system, including, but not limited to, make, model, 18color, and automobile characteristics. 19    "Employee of a foreign entity" means an employee or 20contractor of any branch of the federal government or federal 21agency, a state or local agency or unit of local government 22other than this State.23    "Employee of a government entity" means an employee or 24contractor of any State or local agency, unit of local 25government, or private entity charged with the enforcement of 26State, county, or municipal laws. "Employee of a government   SB3816- 3 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1entity" does not include law enforcement agencies.2    "Employee of a law enforcement agency" means any 3department or agency of this State or a political subdivision 4of this State or local agency, or unit of local government, 5charged with the enforcement of State, county, or municipal 6laws or with managing custody of detained persons in this 7State or jurisdiction, or vested by law with the duty to 8maintain public order and to enforce criminal laws, or an 9individual acting for or on behalf of the State or political 10subdivision thereof. 11    "Facial recognition" means any combination of hardware, 12software, firmware, application, or tools that assists in 13identifying or verifying or persistently tracking an 14individual based on a scan of an individual's face geometry in 15still or video images, streams, or recordings. 16    "Forcible felony" means the following offenses as defined 17in the Criminal Code of 2012 or substantially similar federal 18or other State criminal laws: first degree murder, second 19degree murder, predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 20aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, 21trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, armed robbery, 22home invasion, aggravated arson, arson, aggravated kidnaping, 23kidnapping, and aggravated battery resulting in great bodily 24harm or permanent disability or disfigurement.25    "Foreign entity" means any branch of the federal 26government or federal agency or a state or local agency or unit   SB3816- 4 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1of local government other than this State.2    "Government entity" means a State or local agency, unit of 3local government, or private entity charged with the 4enforcement of State, county, or municipal laws. "Government 5entity" does not include law enforcement agencies.6    "Hot list" means a predetermined list or database of 7license plates relevant and material to an ongoing 8investigation for comparison against license plates or 9vehicles scanned by ALPRs.10    "Law enforcement agency" means any department or agency of 11this State or a political subdivision of this State or local 12agency, or unit of local government, charged with the 13enforcement of State, county, or municipal laws or with 14managing custody of detained persons in this State or 15jurisdiction, or vested by law with the duty to maintain 16public order and to enforce criminal laws, or an individual 17acting for or on behalf of the State or a political subdivision 18thereof. 19    Section 10. Authorized uses. 20    (a) It is unlawful for any law enforcement agency or 21government entity to use, operate, or access any ALPR, ALPR 22system, or captured plate data, except when authorized by 23subsections (b), (c), and (d) and used in compliance with this 24Act.25    (b) An ALPR, ALPR system, or captured plate data may be   SB3816- 5 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1used, operated, or accessed by a law enforcement agency for 2the comparison of captured plate data with (i) Illinois Amber 3Alert, Silver Search, Endangered Missing Person Advisory, and 4FBI Kidnapping and Missing Persons lists, (ii) the Secretary 5of State Department of Police and Vehicle Services Department 6databases maintained by the Secretary of State, (iii) the Law 7Enforcement Agencies Data System maintained by the Illinois 8State Police, and (iv) license plate numbers that have been 9manually entered into a State or local ALPR system database 10upon an officer's determination that the vehicles or 11individuals associated with the license plate number are 12relevant and material to an investigation of a vehicle that 13is: 14        (1) associated with a missing person as defined by 15    Illinois Amber Alert, Silver Search or Endangered Missing 16    Person Advisory criteria; 17        (2) stolen; 18        (3) associated with a hit and run crash; 19        (4) registered to an individual for whom there is an 20    outstanding felony warrant; or 21        (5) related to or involved in a forcible felony.22    (c) An ALPR, ALPR system, or captured plate data may be 23used, operated, or accessed by a government entity: 24        (1) for the purpose of electronic toll assessment and 25    collection; 26        (2) by parking enforcement entities for regulating the   SB3816- 6 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    use of parking facilities or enforcing time restrictions 2    on the use of parking spaces; or 3        (3) for controlling access to secured areas that have 4    clear boundaries, entry only through specific controlled 5    points and limited access.6    (d) An ALPR, ALPR system, or captured plate data may be 7used, operated, or accessed by a law enforcement agency or 8government entity to identify and track vehicles used by 9foreign entities, or employees of foreign entities, for the 10purpose of investigating whether vehicles, individuals, or 11agencies associated with the license plates are engaged in the 12following unlawful conduct:13        (1) monitoring, tracking, or detaining individuals or 14    groups engaging in political protests, marches, 15    demonstrations, or other assembly protected by the First 16    Amendment; 17        (2) immigration enforcement without a judicial order; 18        (3) vehicle crashes; 19        (4) swapping, altering, tampering with, or otherwise 20    making any change to a license plate that is properly 21    displayed on a vehicle in violation of subsection (l) of 22    Section 3-413 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; 23        (5) displaying or affixing to a vehicle any license 24    plate not authorized by law and issued by the Secretary of 25    State for use on that vehicle in violation of paragraph 26    (4) of subsection (a) of Section 4-104 of the Illinois   SB3816- 7 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    Vehicle Code; 2        (6) actions of foreign entities, and employees of 3    foreign entities, that are relevant to the Illinois 4    Accountability Commission's work, or that of any other 5    State, city, municipal, or federal body created to gather 6    information, documentation, and reports of potential 7    violations of law by federal agencies, employees, or 8    contractors, for investigation purposes; or9        (7) violations of State, county or municipal laws or 10    ordinances.11    (e) Law enforcement agencies and government entities 12authorized to use ALPRs, ALPR systems or captured plate data 13under this Section are required to update their ALPR systems 14in real-time at the beginning of each shift, or whenever such 15updates are available, and must document the reason for each 16manually entered license plate.  17    Section 15. Data retention for authorized uses. Captured 18plate data collected by or on behalf of a law enforcement 19agency or government entity, as authorized for collection 20under Section 10, shall not be used, operated, or accessed for 21any other purpose and shall be deleted within 3 days, except 22that such data may be retained: 23        (1) for as long as such captured plate data is needed 24    as evidence of specific unlawful conduct enumerated in 25    subsection (b) of Section 10, as long as captured plate   SB3816- 8 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    data is a confirmed hit and is destroyed at the conclusion 2    of either an investigation that does not result in any 3    criminal charges being filed, or any criminal action 4    undertaken in the matter involving the captured plate 5    data; 6        (2) for purposes of and only to the extent necessary 7    under subsection (c) of Section 10; 8        (3) for as long as such captured plate data is needed 9    for identification, tracking, or investigation purposes 10    under paragraphs (1) through (5) and (7) of subsection (d) 11    of Section 10; 12        (4) for as long as such captured plate data is needed 13    to document and investigate the conduct of federal 14    agencies, employees, or contractors under paragraph (d)(6) 15    of Section 10, and is destroyed at the conclusion of (i) an 16    Illinois Accountability Commission investigation that does 17    not result in a referral, (ii) an investigation conducted 18    by an agency or entity based on a referral by the Illinois 19    Accountability Commission as authorized by Executive Order 20    2025-06, or (iii) any other State, municipal, or federal 21    investigation described in paragraph (6) of subsection (d) 22    of Section 10; 23        (5) Pursuant to a preservation request or disclosure 24    order under Section 35; or 25        (6) Pursuant to a valid criminal warrant issued upon a 26    judicial determination of probable cause, and in   SB3816- 9 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    compliance with the requirements of the Fourth Amendment 2    to the U.S. Constitution and Article I, Section 6 of the 3    Illinois Constitution. 4    Section 20. Prohibited uses. 5    (a) It is unlawful for any law enforcement agency or 6government entity to: 7        (1) sell, lease, rent, or purchase any captured plate 8    data; 9        (2) share, transfer, or otherwise provide captured 10    plate data to any foreign entity or employee of a foreign 11    entity, except if authorized under subparagraph (B) of 12    paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Section 25;13        (3) use or allow access to any ALPR, ALPR system, or 14    captured plate data to seek or compile information on any 15    individual, group, or organization based solely on: 16            (A) political, social, or religious views or 17        activities; 18            (B) participation in non-criminal organizations or 19        lawful events; 20            (C) race, ethnicity, citizenship, age, disability, 21        gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, or other 22        classification protected by law; or 23            (D) seeking or providing access to lawful health 24        care as defined in Section 28-10 of the Lawful Health 25        Care Activity Act;   SB3816- 10 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        (4) use, or allow access to, any ALPR, ALPR system or 2    captured plate data to: 3            (A) monitor, track, investigate or detain 4        individuals (i) engaging in political protests, 5        marches, demonstrations, trainings and community 6        gatherings, or other assembly protected by the First 7        Amendment, (ii) seeking or providing lawful health 8        care as defined in Section 28-10 of the Lawful Health 9        Care Activity Act, or (iii) for immigration 10        enforcement purposes; 11            (B) monitor, track, or investigate organizations 12        that organize or provide support for (i) activities 13        related to freedom of speech, freedom of the press, 14        the right to peaceably assemble, and the right to 15        petition the government as protected by the First 16        Amendment and Illinois law or (ii) access to lawful 17        health care as defined in Section 28-10 of the Lawful 18        Health Care Activity Act; or 19            (C) gather location data or compile information, 20        including for the purpose of creating or populating 21        any database, watch list, or any other mechanism that 22        can be used to target and surveil (i) political 23        protests, marches, demonstrations, community 24        trainings, or gatherings or other assembly protected 25        by the First Amendment, (ii) health facilities that 26        provide lawful health care as defined in Section 28-10   SB3816- 11 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act, or (iii) 2        public schools, public libraries, courthouses, and 3        shelters for immigration enforcement purposes;4        (5) use, or allow access to, an ALPR, ALPR system, or 5    captured plate data for immigration enforcement; 6        (6) use facial recognition software or technology, or 7    other biometric information, in combination with any ALPR, 8    ALPR system, or captured plate data; or 9        (7) enter into a contract, continue to contract with, 10    or share information with a vendor when the agency or 11    entity knows, or should have known, that captured plate 12    data shared using the vendor's ALPR or ALPR system has 13    been or will be used to: 14            (A) monitor, track, investigate or detain 15        individuals (i) engaging in political protest, 16        marches, demonstrations, trainings and community 17        gatherings, or other assembly protected by the First 18        Amendment, (ii) seeking or providing lawful health 19        care as defined in Section 28-10 of the Lawful Health 20        Care Activity Act, or (iii) for immigration 21        enforcement purposes; or 22            (B) monitor, track, or investigate organizations 23        that organize or provide support for (i) activities 24        related to freedom of speech, freedom of the press, 25        the right to peaceably assemble, and the right to 26        petition the government as protected by the First   SB3816- 12 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        Amendment and State law or (ii) access to lawful 2        health care as defined in Section 28-10 of the Lawful 3        Health Care Activity Act.4    (b) It is unlawful for any vendor or contractor to sell, 5share, allow access to, or transfer captured plate data with 6any foreign entity unless the requesting agency has obtained a 7criminal warrant issued upon a judicial determination of 8probable cause, and in compliance with the requirements of the 9Fourth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution and Article I, 10Section 6 of the Illinois Constitution.11    (c) It is unlawful for any law enforcement agency, 12government entity, or vendor, to operate, maintain or access 13an ALPR, an ALPR system, or captured plate data unless that 14agency, entity or vendor is in full compliance with the 15requirements set forth in this Act.  16    Section 25. Restrictions on use. 17    (a) Beginning after the effective date of this Act, all 18new, updated expansions of, or addenda of contractual 19agreements with ALPR vendors shall mandate that no default 20access is provided to any national ALPR database and law 21enforcement agency or government entity captured plate data, 22is by default, not accessible to any other law enforcement 23agency, government entity, or foreign entity. 24    (b) It is unlawful to access, share, transfer, or 25otherwise provide locally collected captured plate data   SB3816- 13 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1unless: 2        (1) the law enforcement agency or government entity in 3    receipt of the request is authorized to access, share, 4    transfer, or otherwise provide the captured plate data 5    under this Act; 6        (2) the captured plate data requested is authorized 7    under subsection (b) or (d) of Section 10; and 8        (3) the requester is: 9            (A) an in-state law enforcement agency, in 10        compliance with this Act, the requesting agency is in 11        receipt of a valid written declaration as required 12        under Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and 13        the request is accompanied by a valid and current case 14        file number that is linked to a downloadable detailed 15        file or report; 16            (B) making the request pursuant to a valid 17        criminal warrant issued upon a judicial determination 18        of probable cause, and in compliance with the 19        requirements of the Fourth Amendment to the U.S. 20        Constitution and Article I, Section 6 of the Illinois 21        Constitution; or22            (C) making the request pursuant to a disclosure 23        order authorized under Section 35.  24    Section 30. Requirements for use. 25    (a) Prior to using, operating, maintaining, or accessing   SB3816- 14 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1any ALPR, ALPR system, or captured plate data, a law 2enforcement agency or government entity shall: 3        (1) Provide a presentation that includes a meaningful 4    opportunity for public comment at a regularly scheduled 5    public meeting of the governing body of the law 6    enforcement agency or government entity. 7            (A) Before a decision is made to use an ALPR, ALPR 8        system, or captured plate data, the law enforcement 9        agency or government entity shall provide a public 10        presentation that includes (i) information about the 11        ALPR, including information on the technology, 12        equipment, tools, and associated vendors, (ii) 13        authorized uses under this Act, and (iii) where, why, 14        and how it may be used. The presentation must provide a 15        meaningful opportunity for the public to comment, ask 16        questions, give feedback, and raise concerns. 17            (B) If use of an ALPR system was approved and 18        implemented before the effective date of this Act, the 19        law enforcement agency or government entity shall 20        provide a public presentation, prior to the effective 21        date of this Act, that includes (i) information about 22        the ALPR systems, including information on the 23        technology, equipment, tools, and vendors used, (ii) 24        where, why, and how they have been used, (iii) the 25        types and description of information collected, 26        shared, and received, and (iv) any changes that will   SB3816- 15 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        be made to comply with this Act. The presentation must 2        provide a meaningful opportunity for the public to 3        comment, ask questions, give feedback, and raise 4        concerns. If the presentation is not made before the 5        effective date of this Act, the law enforcement agency 6        or government entity shall be prohibited from 7        continuing to operate, use or access any ALPR, ALPR 8        system or captured plate data until a presentation 9        that meets the requirements under this subsection is 10        completed. 11        (2) Adopt, implement, disclose, and maintain an ALPR 12    usage and privacy policy that ensures that the collection, 13    access, use, sharing, retention and deletion of ALPR 14    captured plate data is authorized under this Act and 15    consistent with respect for individuals' privacy, civil 16    liberties, and civil rights, including prohibiting 17    non-essential data collection and sharing, and protecting 18    the security of data collected. The ALPR usage and privacy 19    policy shall be made available to the public in writing 20    and shall be conspicuously posted or linked to its 21    Internet website in a manner that is easily accessible to 22    individuals. The usage and privacy policy shall, at a 23    minimum, include the following information: 24            (A) authorized uses of ALPRs, ALPR systems, and 25        captured plate data; 26            (B) authorized purposes for collecting, accessing,   SB3816- 16 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        and using captured plate data; 2            (C) the purposes, process, and restrictions 3        related to the sharing or transfer of captured plate 4        data with other law enforcement agencies, government 5        entities, or foreign entities; 6            (D) a description of the measures that will be 7        used to ensure the accuracy of captured plate data and 8        correct data errors; 9            (E) the length of time captured plate data will be 10        retained, including the maximum data retention period 11        for non-hit data and data collected and used as 12        authorized by Sections 10 and 15; 13            (F) a description of the job title or other 14        designation of the employees and independent 15        contractors who are authorized to access and use 16        captured plate data. The policy shall identify the 17        screening and training requirements necessary for 18        those authorized employees and independent 19        contractors; 20            (G) a description of how ALPRs, ALPR systems, and 21        captured plate data will be monitored to ensure the 22        security of the information accessed or used, 23        compliance with all applicable privacy laws, and a 24        process for periodic system audits; and 25            (H) a description of the range of disciplinary 26        actions available for violation of the usage and   SB3816- 17 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        privacy policies. 2        (3) Adopt, implement, and maintain reasonable security 3    procedures and practices, including operational, 4    administrative, technical, and physical safeguards, to 5    protect captured plate data from unauthorized access, 6    destruction, use, modification, or disclosure, including, 7    but not limited to: 8            (A) safeguards for managing which employees can 9        see the data from its systems, including requiring 10        supervisory approval, robust authentication protocols 11        for establishing an account to access an ALPR system 12        and tracking searches of captured plate data made by 13        employees; 14            (B) requiring data security training and data 15        privacy training for all employees that access 16        captured plate data; and 17            (C) an audit process to ensure that captured plate 18        data obtained through the use of an ALPR or ALPR system 19        is used only for authorized purposes, including audits 20        of requests made by individual law enforcement 21        agencies or government entities.22    (b) Any ALPR operator that accesses or provides access to 23captured plate data under this Act shall maintain a record of 24when captured plate data is accessed that shall include, at a 25minimum: 26        (1) the date and time the information is accessed;   SB3816- 18 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        (2) the license plate number or other data elements 2    used to query the ALPR system; 3        (3) the username of the person who accesses the 4    information, and, as applicable, the organization or 5    entity with whom the person is affiliated; 6        (4) the purpose for accessing the information; and 7        (5) the justification for the search, a linked copy of 8    the justification saved and linked to the search query, 9    and whether access was authorized by (i) a case file 10    number, accompanied by a detailed case file or report, 11    (ii) a criminal warrant issued upon a judicial 12    determination of probable cause, and in compliance with 13    the requirements of the Fourth Amendment to the U.S. 14    Constitution and Article I, Section 6 of the Illinois 15    Constitution, or (iii) a written declaration as required 16    under Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.  17    Section 35. Preservation and disclosure. 18    (a) Upon the written request of a law enforcement agency, 19government entity, or a defendant in a criminal case, a law 20enforcement agency or government entity that uses, operates, 21or accesses an ALPR, ALPR system, or captured plate data shall 22take all necessary steps to preserve specified captured plate 23data in its possession for 30 days pending the issuance of a 24court order sought pursuant to subsection (b) if the 25requesting law enforcement agency, government entity or   SB3816- 19 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1defendant in a criminal case makes a retention request and 2specifies in a written, sworn statement: 3        (1) the specific camera or cameras for which captured 4    data must be preserved, or the specific license plate for 5    which captured plate data must be preserved; 6        (2) the date or dates and timeframes for which 7    captured plate data must be preserved; and 8        (3) that a court order for the retention and 9    disclosure of captured plate data will be sought, pursuant 10    to subsection (b), in a court of competent jurisdiction 11    within 5 days of the transmission of the preservation 12    request. 13    (b) A law enforcement agency, government entity or 14defendant in a criminal case may apply for a court order for 15the extended retention and disclosure of captured plate data, 16which shall be issued by any court of competent jurisdiction, 17if the law enforcement agency, government entity, or defendant 18in a criminal case offers specific and articulable facts 19showing there is probable cause to believe that captured plate 20data is relevant and material to an ongoing felony criminal or 21missing persons investigation, prosecution, or defense. 22    (c) Captured plate data held by a law enforcement agency 23or government entity for more than 30 days pursuant to 24subsection (b) preservation request shall be destroyed within 2524 hours if: 26        (1) an application for the court order is not made   SB3816- 20 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    within five days of the preservation request; or 2        (2) the application for the court order made pursuant 3    to subsection (b) is denied.4    (d) Notice of a data deletion triggering event as 5enumerated in paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (c), shall be 6provided within 24 hours of its occurrence by the person, 7agency, or entity who made the preservation request authorized 8by subsection (a) to the recipient of that request.  9    Section 40. Required data collection. Any law enforcement 10agency or government entity that uses, operates, or accesses 11ALPRs, ALPR systems, or captured plate data shall, at a 12minimum, collect information related to following categories 13for reporting purposes: 14    (1) ALPR and ALPR systems and vendors, including: 15        (A) the total number of ALPRs operated, or otherwise 16    accessed, including the specific number of fixed, mobile 17    and portable devices, and mobile applications;18        (B) a complete list of all other ALPR systems used, 19    operated, or otherwise accessed; 20        (C) the specific number of ALPRs and ALPR systems 21    owned or leased but not in use at any time during the 22    reporting period and reasons why they were not 23    operational; and24        (D) a complete list of ALPR related vendors, including 25    the vendor services used and length of the contract term   SB3816- 21 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    for each vendor.2    (2) Captured plate data collection and uses, including: 3        (A) the total number of license plates scanned for 4    uses authorized under subsection (c) of Section 10; 5        (B) the total number of manually entered license 6    plates, and the specific number of manually entered 7    license plates for each offense category authorized under 8    subsection (b) of Section 10, and the number of confirmed 9    matches for each category;10        (C) the total number of arrests directly attributed to 11    ALPR hot list detections authorized under subsection (b) 12    of Section 10 and the specific number by each enumerated 13    category;14        (D) the total number of convictions directly 15    attributed to ALPR hot list detections authorized under 16    subsection (b) of Section 10 and the specific number by 17    each enumerated category;18        (E) the total number of license plates scanned for the 19    purposes authorized by subsection (d) of Section 10 and 20    the specific number by each enumerated category; 21        (F) the total number of investigations conducted as 22    authorized under subsection (d) of Section 10 and the 23    specific number by each enumerated category;24        (G) the total number of investigations that resulted 25    in a finding of unlawful conduct under subsection (d) of 26    Section 10 and the specific number by each enumerated   SB3816- 22 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    category; and 2        (H) the total number of investigations authorized 3    under paragraph (5) of subsection (d) of Section 10 that 4    resulted in a referral to the Illinois Accountability 5    Commission. 6    (3) Requests for captured plate data, including: 7        (A) the total number of requests received; 8        (B) the total number of requests that resulted in the 9    release of information and the authorization used to 10    release the information; 11        (C) the total number of in-state requests, and for 12    each in-state requester, (i) the specific number of 13    requests that resulted in the release of information, (ii) 14    the authorization used to release the information, and 15    (iii) the name and municipality of the requester;16        (D) the total number of out-of-state requests, and for 17    each out-of-state requester, (i) the specific number of 18    requests that resulted in a release of information, (ii) 19    the authorization used to release the information, and 20    (iii) the name and state of the requester; 21        (E) the total number of federal requests, and for each 22    federal requester, (i) the specific number of requests 23    that resulted in a release of information, (ii) the 24    authorization used to release the information, and (iii) 25    the name and associated agency of the requester;26        (F) the total number of valid written declarations   SB3816- 23 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    entered into as required under subsection (c) of Section 2    2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and for each written 3    declaration: 4            (i) the name and state of each law enforcement 5        agency that submitted a written declaration; 6            (ii) the length of the sharing authorized under 7        the written declaration and whether sharing is still 8        authorized as of the reporting period; and 9            (iii) whether there have been any instances of 10        non-compliance with the data requirements outlined in 11        Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code during the 12        reporting period; 13        (G) the total number and kind of any other data 14    sharing practices or agreements entered into with any 15    other ALPR user, and for each of the data sharing 16    practices or agreements: 17            (i) the name, state, and type of ALPR user; 18            (ii) the authorization for data sharing and 19        whether the agreement allows data sharing only, data 20        receiving only, or data sharing and receiving; 21            (iii) the length of sharing authorized under the 22        data sharing practice or agreement and whether sharing 23        is still authorized as of the reporting period; and 24            (iv) whether there have been any instances of 25        non-compliance with the data sharing practice or 26        agreement during the reporting period;  SB3816- 24 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    (4) Protections and transparency, including: 2        (A) the number of unauthorized uses of any ALPR, ALPR 3    system, or captured plate data; 4        (B) the number of data breaches of the ALPR system or 5    captured plate data; and6        (C) a list of internal or external audits that were 7    completed and by whom. 8    Section 45. Reporting. 9    (a) All law enforcement agencies and government entities 10shall publicly disclose whether they operate, use, or 11otherwise access an ALPR, ALPR system, or captured plate data 12on or before April 1 of each year. The reporting requirements 13under this subsection shall begin on the first April after the 14effective date of this Act and annually thereafter. 15        (1) Any law enforcement agency or government entity 16    that operates, uses, or otherwise accesses any ALPR system 17    shall report in writing, and publish on its publicly 18    available website, a report that includes the required 19    data collected under Section 40 from February 1 of the 20    previous calendar year through January 31 of the reporting 21    year. The report shall also contain a copy of, or link to, 22    the agency's latest ALPR policy as required under Section 23    30 as of March 1 of the reporting year.24        (2) Any law enforcement agency or government entity 25    that does not own, operate, or otherwise access an ALPR,   SB3816- 25 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    ALPR system, or captured plate data shall report in 2    writing, and publish on its publicly available website, 3    that it did not own or use an ALPR, ALPR system, or 4    captured plate data between February 1 of the previous 5    calendar year through January 31 of the reporting year.6    (b) All law enforcement agencies or government entities 7shall report to the Secretary of State, and any local body that 8governs that agency or entity, whether they own, operate, or 9otherwise access an ALPR, ALPR system, or captured plate data 10on or before April 1 of each year, beginning after the 11effective date of this Act. 12        (1) Any law enforcement agency or government entity 13    that owns, operates, or otherwise accesses an ALPR, ALPR 14    system, or captured plate data, shall submit the report 15    required under subsection (a) and certify in writing that 16    it is in compliance with the provisions of this Act.17        (2) Any law enforcement agency or government entity 18    that does not own or use an ALPR, ALPR system, or captured 19    data shall report in writing that it was not in possession 20    of any ALPR, ALPR system, or captured plate data between 21    February 1 of the previous calendar year through January 22    31 of the reporting year.23    (c) On or before May 1 of each year, beginning after the 24effective date of this Act, the Secretary of State shall 25publish on its publicly available website a report, or link to 26a report that includes:   SB3816- 26 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        (1) the total number of ALPRs operated in the State by 2    law enforcement agencies and by governmental entities; 3        (2) the total number of law enforcement agencies and 4    total number of governmental entities that own, operate, 5    or otherwise access ALPR systems or captured plate data 6    between February 1 of the previous calendar year through 7    January 31 of the reporting year, and for each law 8    enforcement agency or government entity, a list, separated 9    by county and municipality: 10            (A) the number and kinds of ALPRs or ALPR systems, 11        including the specific number of fixed, mobile and 12        portable devices, and mobile applications; and 13            (B) the list of vendors, and related services 14        provided by each vendor; 15        (3) the total number of law enforcement agencies with 16    valid written declaration as required under subsection (c) 17    of Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and for 18    each law enforcement agency: 19            (A) the name and state of the out-of-state law 20        enforcement agencies that submitted a written 21        declaration; 22            (B) the length of the sharing authorized under the 23        written declaration and whether sharing is still 24        authorized, as of the reporting period; and 25            (C) whether there have been any instances of 26        non-compliance with the data requirements outlined in   SB3816- 27 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code by the 2        out-of-state law enforcement agency during the 3        reporting period; 4        (4) the total number and kind of any other data 5    sharing practices or agreements entered into by law 6    enforcement and by governmental entities with any other 7    ALPR user, and for each of those entities: 8            (A) the name, state, and type of ALPR user; 9            (B) the authorization for data sharing and whether 10        the agreement allows data sharing, data receiving or 11        both sharing and receiving; 12            (C) the length of the sharing authorized under the 13        data sharing practice or agreement and whether sharing 14        is still authorized, as of the reporting period; and 15            (D) whether there have been any instances of 16        non-compliance with the data sharing practice or 17        agreement during the reporting period;18        (5) the total number of requests made to law 19    enforcement agencies, and the number of requests that 20    resulted in the release of information, including the 21    specific number of: 22            (A) in-state requests, and in-state requests that 23        resulted in the release of information; 24            (B) out-of-state requests, and out-of-state 25        requests that resulted in the release of information; 26        and   SB3816- 28 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1            (C) federal requests, and federal requests that 2        resulted in the release of information;3        (6) the total number of requests made to governmental 4    entities, and the number of requests that resulted in the 5    release of information, including the specific number of: 6            (A) in-state requests and in-state requests that 7        resulted in the release of information; 8            (B) out-of-state requests and out-of-state 9        requests that resulted in the release of information; 10        and 11            (C) federal requests and federal requests that 12        resulted in the release of information;13        (7) the number of unauthorized uses of any ALPR, ALPR 14    system, or captured plate data; 15        (8) the number of data breaches of the ALPR system or 16    captured plate data; 17        (9) a list of, and a link to, any audits completed by 18    the Secretary of State; 19        (10) a list of law enforcement agencies and a list of 20    government entities that did not own, operate, or 21    otherwise access any ALPR, ALPR system, or captured plate 22    data in the previous calendar year, as reported to the 23    Secretary of State under subsection (b); and 24        (11) a direct link to the publicly available report 25    submitted by each law enforcement agency or government 26    entity as required under subsection (a).   SB3816- 29 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    Section 50. Admissibility. 2    (a) If a court finds by a preponderance of the evidence 3that captured plate data was gathered, stored, used, or 4disclosed in violation of this Act, then that information 5shall be presumed to be inadmissible in any judicial or 6administrative proceeding. The State may overcome this 7presumption by proving the applicability of a judicially 8recognized exception to the exclusionary rule of the Fourth 9Amendment to the U.S. Constitution or Article I, Section 6 of 10the Illinois Constitution, or by a preponderance of the 11evidence that the individual, partnership, corporation, 12association, or the law enforcement officer was acting in good 13faith and reasonably believed that one or more of the 14exceptions identified in subsection (b), (c), or (d) of 15Section 10 existed at the time that the captured plate 16information was gathered, stored, used, or disclosed. 17    (b) No captured plate data and no evidence derived 18therefrom may be received in evidence in any trial, hearing, 19or other proceeding in or before any court, grand jury, 20department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative 21committee, or other authority of the State, or a political 22subdivision thereof, if the disclosure of that information 23would be in violation of this Act. 24    Section 55. Privacy.   SB3816- 30 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    (a) Captured plate data is not considered a public record 2for the purposes of Section 7 of the Freedom of Information Act 3and may only be disclosed to the person to whom the vehicle is 4registered, or with the prior written consent of the person to 5whom the vehicle is registered.6    (b) Upon the presentation to an appropriate governmental 7entity of a valid, outstanding protection order protecting the 8driver of a vehicle jointly registered with or registered 9solely in the name of the individual against whom the order was 10issued, captured plate data may not be disclosed except 11pursuant to a disclosure order under Section 35 or as the 12result of a match pursuant to Section 10. 13    Section 60. Penalties. 14    (a) An officer or employee of a law enforcement agency or 15employee of a government entity, who intentionally fails to 16perform any act required by this Act is guilty of official 17misconduct and may be punished in accordance with Section 33-3 18of the Criminal Code of 2012.19    (b) The knowing and intentional violation of Section 10, 2015, 20, 25, 30, 35, 40, or 45 by an officer or employee of any 21law enforcement agency or employee of a government entity 22shall constitute a cause for discipline, including termination 23of employment. 24    (c) Any law enforcement agency or government entity that 25fails to use, operate, maintain, or access an ALPR, an ALPR   SB3816- 31 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1system, or captured plate data in full compliance with the 2requirements set forth in this Act shall trigger a 3-month use 3prohibition for the first offense and a 6-month use 4prohibition for each subsequent offense.5    (d) Any violation of the requirements under this Act made 6by or the result of the actions or inactions of a vendor shall 7render the contract null and void and without legal force or 8effect. 9    Section 65. Private right of action. 10    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person 11who violates the provisions of this Act is subject to legal 12action for damages, to be brought by any other person claiming 13that a violation of this Act has injured the person's 14business, the person, or the person's reputation. A person so 15injured is entitled to actual damages, including mental pain 16and suffering endured by the person on account of violation of 17the provisions of this Act, or liquidated damages, and 18reasonable attorney's fees, and other costs of litigation. 19    (b) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this Act shall 20have a right of action in a State circuit court or as a 21supplemental claim in federal district court against an 22offending party. A prevailing party may recover for each 23violation:24        (1) against any offending party that negligently 25    violates a provision of this Act, liquidated damages of   SB3816- 32 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    $1,000 or actual damages, whichever is greater; 2        (2) against any offending party that intentionally or 3    recklessly violates a provision of this Act, liquidated 4    damages of $5,000 or actual damages, whichever is greater;5        (3) reasonable attorney's fees and costs, including 6    expert witness fees and other litigation expenses; and 7        (4) other relief, including an injunction, as the 8    State or federal court may deem appropriate.9    (c) Any law enforcement agency or government entity 10aggrieved by a vendor's violation of this Act may file suit in 11any court of competent jurisdiction for injuries sustained as 12a result of the vendor's violation. Each individual search or 13share of information constitutes a separate violation. If such 14violation is found to occur, the court may assess a civil 15penalty of $10,000 per violation, injunctive relief, and 16reasonable attorney's fees and costs. This subsection shall 17not constitute a limitation on any other private right of 18action. 19    Section 900. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 20changing Section 7 as follows: 21    (5 ILCS 140/7)22    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-300)23    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 24    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public   SB3816- 33 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1record that contains information that is exempt from 2disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 3that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 4to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 5shall make the remaining information available for inspection 6and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 7be exempt from inspection and copying: 8        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 9    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 10    regulations implementing federal or State law. 11        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 12    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 13    or a court order. 14        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 15    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 16    specifically designed to provide information to one or 17    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 18    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 19        (c) Personal information contained within public 20    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 21    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 22    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 23    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 24    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 25    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 26    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to   SB3816- 34 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 2    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 3    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 4    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 5    privacy. 6        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 7    created in the course of administrative enforcement 8    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 9    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 10    extent that disclosure would: 11            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 12        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 13        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 14        agency that is the recipient of the request; 15            (ii) interfere with active administrative 16        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 17        that is the recipient of the request; 18            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 19        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 20        hearing; 21            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 22        confidential source, confidential information 23        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 24        who file complaints with or provide information to 25        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 26        penal agencies; except that the identities of   SB3816- 35 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 2        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 3        local government, except when disclosure would 4        interfere with an active criminal investigation 5        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 6        request; 7            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 8        techniques other than those generally used and known 9        or disclose internal documents of correctional 10        agencies related to detection, observation, or 11        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 12        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 13        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 14        request; 15            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 16        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 17            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 18        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 19        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 20    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 21    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 22    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 23    request did not create the record, did not participate in 24    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 25    of the record, and only has access to the record through 26    the shared electronic record management system. As used in   SB3816- 36 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 2    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 3    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.4        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 5    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 6    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 7    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 8    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 9    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 10    Board. 11        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 12    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 13    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 14        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 15    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 16        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 19    materials are available in the library of the correctional 20    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 21    confined. 22        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 23    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 24    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 25    materials include records from staff members' personnel 26    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment   SB3816- 37 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    information. 2        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 3    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 4    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 5    through an administrative request to the Department of 6    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 7    Mental Health. 8        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 9    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 10    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 11    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 12    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 13    institution or facility.14        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 15    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 16    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 17    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 18    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 19    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 20    or school address, work telephone number, social security 21    number, or any other identifying information, except as 22    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 23    or claim. 24        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 25    requested by a person committed to the Department of 26    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of   SB3816- 38 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 2    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 3    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 4    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 5    claim. 6        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 7    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 8    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 9    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 10    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 11    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 12    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 13    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 14    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 15        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 16    information obtained from a person or business where the 17    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 18    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 19    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 20    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 21    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 22    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 23    requested.24        The information included under this exemption includes 25    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 26    obtained by a public body, including a public pension   SB3816- 39 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 2    company within the investment portfolio of a private 3    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 4    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 5    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 6    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 7    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 8    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 9    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 10    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 11    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 12    privately held company may cause competitive harm.13        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 14    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 15    to disclosure. 16        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 17    agreement, including information which if it were 18    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 19    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 20    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 21    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 22    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 23    award or final selection is made. 24        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 25    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 26    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be   SB3816- 40 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 2    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 3    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 4    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 5    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 6    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 7    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 8    legal rights of the general public. 9        (j) The following information pertaining to 10    educational matters:11            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 12        examination data used to administer an academic 13        examination; 14            (ii) information received by a primary or 15        secondary school, college, or university under its 16        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 17        their academic peers; 18            (iii) information concerning a school or 19        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 20        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 21        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and22            (iv) course materials or research materials used 23        by faculty members. 24        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 25    submissions, and other construction related technical 26    documents for projects not constructed or developed in   SB3816- 41 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 2    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 3    including, but not limited to, power generating and 4    distribution stations and other transmission and 5    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 6    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 7    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 8    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 9    security. 10        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 11    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 12    public body makes the minutes available to the public 13    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 14        (m) Communications between a public body and an 15    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 16    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 17    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 18    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 19    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 20    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 21    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 22        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 23    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 24    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 25    cases in which discipline is imposed. 26        (o) Administrative or technical information associated   SB3816- 42 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    with automated data processing operations, including, but 2    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 3    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 4    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 5    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 6    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 7    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 8    security of the system or its data or the security of 9    materials exempt under this Section. 10        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 11    between public bodies and their employees or 12    representatives, except that any final contract or 13    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 14        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 15    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 16    an applicant for a license or employment. 17        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 18    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 19    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 20    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 21    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 22    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 23    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 24    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 25    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 26    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt   SB3816- 43 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    until a sale is consummated. 2        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 3    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 4    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 5    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 6    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 7    intergovernmental risk management association or 8    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 9    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 10        (t) Information contained in or related to 11    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 12    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 13    for the regulation or supervision of financial 14    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 15    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 16    law. 17        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 18    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 19    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 20    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 21    Electronic Transactions Act. 22        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 23    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 24    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 25    community's population or systems, facilities, or 26    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure   SB3816- 44 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 2    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 3    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 4    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 5    include such things as details pertaining to the 6    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 7    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 8    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 9        (w) (Blank). 10        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 11    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 12    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 13    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 14    Illinois Power Agency. 15        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 16    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 17    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 18    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 19    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 20    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 21    Commission. 22        (z) Information about students exempted from 23    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 24    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 25    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 26    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit   SB3816- 45 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 2        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 3    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 4        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 5    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 6    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 7    Mortality Review Team Act. 8        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 9    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 10    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 11    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.12        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 13    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 14    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 15    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 16        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 17    information of persons who are minors and are also 18    participants and registrants in programs of park 19    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 20    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 21    associations.22        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 23    information of participants and registrants in programs of 24    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 25    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 26    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to   SB3816- 46 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    minors.2        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 3    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 4    2012. 5        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 6    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 7    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 8    School Code and any information contained in that report. 9        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 10    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 11    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 12    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 13    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 14    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 15    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 16    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 17    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 18    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 19    Corrections.20        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 21    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 22        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 23    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 24    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 25    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 26    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding   SB3816- 47 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    of a governmental entity or a person. 2        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 3    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 4    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 5    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 6    the procedure.7        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 8    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 9    Confidential Reporting Act. 10        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 11    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 12    Act. 13        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 14    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 15        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 16    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 17    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 18    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 19    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 20    Act.21        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 22    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 23        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 24    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 25        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 26    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is   SB3816- 48 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    protected health information, including demographic 2    information, that may be contained within or extracted 3    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 4    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 5    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 6    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 7    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 8    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 9    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 10    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 11    160.103. 12        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 13    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 14    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 15    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 16        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 17    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 18    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 19    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 20    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 21    include information classified as safeguards, 22    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 23    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 24    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 25    security advisories, and other applicable communications 26    or regulations related to the control and distribution of   SB3816- 49 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    security sensitive information.2        (vv) Any captured plate data under the Automated 3    License Plate Recognition System Act. 4    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 5Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 6prior to disclosure under this Act. 7    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 8Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 9public records prior to disclosure under this Act.10    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 11paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 12redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 13Act.14    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 15public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 16agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 17behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 18governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 19Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 20for purposes of this Act. 21    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 22information or limit the availability of records to the 23public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 24in this Act. 25(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 26103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff.   SB3816- 50 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b11-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 2eff. 1-1-25; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 104-443, eff. 1-1-26; 3revised 1-7-26.) 4    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-300)5    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 6    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 7record that contains information that is exempt from 8disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 9that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 10to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 11shall make the remaining information available for inspection 12and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 13be exempt from inspection and copying: 14        (a) Records created or compiled by a State public 15    defender agency or commission subject to the State Public 16    Defender Act that contain: individual client identity; 17    individual case file information; individual investigation 18    records and other records that are otherwise subject to 19    attorney-client privilege; records that would not be 20    discoverable in litigation; records under Section 2.15; 21    training materials; records related to attorney 22    consultation and representation strategy; or any of the 23    above concerning clients of county public defenders or 24    other defender agencies and firms. This exclusion does not 25    apply to deidentified, aggregated, administrative records,   SB3816- 51 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    such as general case processing and workload information. 2        (a-5) Information specifically prohibited from 3    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 4    regulations implementing federal or State law. 5        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 6    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 7    or a court order. 8        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 9    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 10    specifically designed to provide information to one or 11    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 12    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 13        (c) Personal information contained within public 14    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 15    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 16    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 17    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 18    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 19    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 20    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 21    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 22    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 23    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 24    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 25    privacy. 26        (d) Records in the possession of any public body   SB3816- 52 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    created in the course of administrative enforcement 2    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 3    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 4    extent that disclosure would: 5            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 6        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 7        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 8        agency that is the recipient of the request; 9            (ii) interfere with active administrative 10        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 11        that is the recipient of the request; 12            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 13        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 14        hearing; 15            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 16        confidential source, confidential information 17        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 18        who file complaints with or provide information to 19        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 20        penal agencies; except that the identities of 21        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 22        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 23        local government, except when disclosure would 24        interfere with an active criminal investigation 25        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 26        request;   SB3816- 53 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 2        techniques other than those generally used and known 3        or disclose internal documents of correctional 4        agencies related to detection, observation, or 5        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 6        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 7        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 8        request; 9            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 10        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 11            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 12        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 13        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 14    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 15    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 16    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 17    request did not create the record, did not participate in 18    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 19    of the record, and only has access to the record through 20    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 21    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 22    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 23    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council.24        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 25    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 26    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that   SB3816- 54 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 2    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 3    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 4    Board. 5        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 6    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 7    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 8        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 9    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 10        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 11    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 12    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 13    materials are available in the library of the correctional 14    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 15    confined. 16        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 19    materials include records from staff members' personnel 20    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 21    information. 22        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 23    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 24    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 25    through an administrative request to the Department of 26    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of   SB3816- 55 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    Mental Health. 2        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 3    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 4    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 5    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 6    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 7    institution or facility.8        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 9    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 10    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 11    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 12    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 13    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 14    or school address, work telephone number, social security 15    number, or any other identifying information, except as 16    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 17    or claim. 18        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 19    requested by a person committed to the Department of 20    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 21    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 22    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 23    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 24    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 25    claim. 26        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations,   SB3816- 56 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 2    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 3    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 4    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 5    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 6    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 7    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 8    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 9        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 10    information obtained from a person or business where the 11    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 12    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 13    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 14    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 15    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 16    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 17    requested.18        The information included under this exemption includes 19    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 20    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 21    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 22    company within the investment portfolio of a private 23    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 24    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 25    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 26    to the aggregate financial performance information of a   SB3816- 57 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 2    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 3    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 4    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 5    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 6    privately held company may cause competitive harm.7        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 8    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 9    to disclosure. 10        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 11    agreement, including information which if it were 12    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 13    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 14    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 15    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 16    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 17    award or final selection is made. 18        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 19    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 20    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 21    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 22    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 23    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 24    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 25    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 26    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate   SB3816- 58 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 2    legal rights of the general public. 3        (j) The following information pertaining to 4    educational matters:5            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 6        examination data used to administer an academic 7        examination; 8            (ii) information received by a primary or 9        secondary school, college, or university under its 10        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 11        their academic peers; 12            (iii) information concerning a school or 13        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 14        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 15        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and16            (iv) course materials or research materials used 17        by faculty members. 18        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 19    submissions, and other construction related technical 20    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 21    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 22    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 23    including, but not limited to, power generating and 24    distribution stations and other transmission and 25    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 26    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers,   SB3816- 59 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 2    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 3    security. 4        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 5    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 6    public body makes the minutes available to the public 7    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 8        (m) Communications between a public body and an 9    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 10    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 11    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 12    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 13    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 14    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 15    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 16        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 17    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 18    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 19    cases in which discipline is imposed. 20        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 21    with automated data processing operations, including, but 22    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 23    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 24    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 25    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 26    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other   SB3816- 60 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 2    security of the system or its data or the security of 3    materials exempt under this Section. 4        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 5    between public bodies and their employees or 6    representatives, except that any final contract or 7    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 8        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 9    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 10    an applicant for a license or employment. 11        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 12    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 13    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 14    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 15    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 16    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 17    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 18    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 19    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 20    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 21    until a sale is consummated. 22        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 23    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 24    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 25    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 26    Insurance or self-insurance (including any   SB3816- 61 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    intergovernmental risk management association or 2    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 3    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 4        (t) Information contained in or related to 5    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 6    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 7    for the regulation or supervision of financial 8    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 9    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 10    law. 11        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 12    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 13    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 14    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 15    Electronic Transactions Act. 16        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 17    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 18    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 19    community's population or systems, facilities, or 20    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 21    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 22    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 23    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 24    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 25    include such things as details pertaining to the 26    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to   SB3816- 62 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 2    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 3        (w) (Blank). 4        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 5    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 6    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 7    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 8    Illinois Power Agency. 9        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 10    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 11    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 12    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 13    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 14    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 15    Commission. 16        (z) Information about students exempted from 17    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 18    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 19    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 20    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 21    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 22        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 23    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 24        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 25    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 26    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice   SB3816- 63 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    Mortality Review Team Act. 2        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 3    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 4    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 5    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.6        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 7    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 8    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 9    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 10        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 11    information of persons who are minors and are also 12    participants and registrants in programs of park 13    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 14    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 15    associations.16        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 17    information of participants and registrants in programs of 18    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 19    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 20    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 21    minors.22        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 23    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 24    2012. 25        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 26    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force   SB3816- 64 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 2    School Code and any information contained in that report. 3        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 4    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 5    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 6    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 7    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 8    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 9    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 10    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 11    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 12    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 13    Corrections.14        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 15    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 16        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 17    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 18    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 19    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 20    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 21    of a governmental entity or a person. 22        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 23    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 24    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 25    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 26    the procedure.  SB3816- 65 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 2    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 3    Confidential Reporting Act. 4        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 5    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 6    Act. 7        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 8    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 9        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 10    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 11    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 12    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 13    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 14    Act.15        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 16    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 17        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 18    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 19        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 20    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 21    protected health information, including demographic 22    information, that may be contained within or extracted 23    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 24    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 25    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 26    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45   SB3816- 66 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 2    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 3    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 4    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 5    160.103. 6        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 7    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 8    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 9    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 10        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 11    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 12    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 13    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 14    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 15    include information classified as safeguards, 16    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 17    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 18    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 19    security advisories, and other applicable communications 20    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 21    security sensitive information. 22        (vv) Any captured plate data under the Automated 23    License Plate Recognition System Act. 24    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 25Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 26prior to disclosure under this Act.   SB3816- 67 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1    (1.6) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 2Public Official Safety and Privacy Act shall be redacted from 3public records prior to disclosure under this Act.4    (1.7) Any information exempt from disclosure under 5paragraph (3.5) of Section 9-15 of the Election Code shall be 6redacted from public records prior to disclosure under this 7Act.8    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 9public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 10agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 11behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 12governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 13Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 14for purposes of this Act. 15    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 16information or limit the availability of records to the 17public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 18in this Act. 19(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23; 103-540, eff. 211-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, 22eff. 1-1-25; 104-300, eff. 1-1-27; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26; 23104-443, eff. 1-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 24    Section 995. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act 25makes changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by   SB3816- 68 -LRB104 20207 LNS 33658 b1text that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a 2Section represented by multiple versions), the use of that 3text does not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the 4changes made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any 5other Public Act. 6    Section 997. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 7severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.